Hawaii statutes.
[§466D-8] Application for license as a
respiratory therapist. The department shall issue a license under this
chapter to an applicant if the applicant provides satisfactory evidence to the
department that the applicant meets the requirements for licensure contained in
this chapter and rules adopted by the director and if the applicant:

(1) Has successfully completed a respiratory therapy
training program at an accredited educational institution approved by the
Committee on Accreditation for Respiratory Care or its predecessor or successor
agencies;

(2) Has passed the Certified Respiratory Therapist
Examination of the National Board for Respiratory Care, or its successor,
within ninety days of submitting an application; and

(3) Has paid all fees for licensure established by
the director. [L 2010, c 178, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next